New Jersey, session 222, S1232.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  As used in this section: Development means the same as the term is defined in section 3.1 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-4). High-density development means a development proposed at a greater concentration of density or intensity of land use than authorized within the area, section, or sections, under the current master plan and development regulations. Stormwater means the same as the term is defined in section 3 of P.L.2019, c.42 (C.40A:26B-3). Warehouse means a building that stores cargo, goods, or products of any type on a short-term or long-term basis for later distribution to wholesale or retail customers, and includes, but is not limited to, a distribution center, flex-warehouse, or any other type of warehouse. Watershed means the same as the term is defined in section 3 of P.L.1997, c.261 (C.58:29-3). b.  Notwithstanding any other law, or rule or regulation adopted pursuant thereto, to the contrary, whenever the Department of Environmental Protection reviews an application for a permit, authorization, or any other type of approval from the department that, if approved, would allow the development of a warehouse or other high-density development, the department shall evaluate the cumulative impact of stormwater that would result from the construction of the warehouse or other high-density development.  When evaluating the cumulative impact of stormwater pursuant to this subsection, the department shall: (1) consider the stormwater impacts that would result from the development on property located within:  the municipality in which the development would be located; any adjoining municipalities, whether located in the same county as the proposed development or in an adjacent county; and the watershed in which the property is located; and (2) ensure that stormwater shall be managed to, at a minimum: (a) induce water recharge into the ground where practical; (b) minimize offsite stormwater runoff in order to not impact property located in an adjacent municipality; (c) maintain the integrity of stream channels for their biological functions, as well as for drainage; and (d) to prevent, to the greatest extent feasible, an increase in nonpoint pollution in the watershed in which the proposed development would occur. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.